Illinois, session 104th, HB849.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Radon Awareness Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (420 ILCS 46/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Radon Awareness Act.9(Source: P.A. 95-210, eff. 1-1-08.)